District of Columbia statutes.
31-4324

Repealed

Political contributions prohibited; immunity of witnesses in proceedings in regard to violations.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1138, ch. 672, ch. II, § 25
Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-232, § 205(a)(2), 54 DCR 368
1981 Ed., § 35-424.
1973 Ed., § 35-424.